District of Columbia statutes.
27-106

Attorney’s fees.

Attorneys’ fees and costs shall be awarded under this subchapter without regard to ability to pay.

May 16, 1992, D.C. Law 9-98, § 7, 39 DCR 678
1981 Ed., § 3-446.
See note to § 27-101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-110, November 25, 1991, 38 DCR 7304).
For temporary addition of chapter, see §§ 2-7 of the Merchant’s Civil Recovery for Criminal Conduct Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-155, February 21, 1992, 39 DCR 1354).
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 20-34 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 1 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter”, where applicable, in this section.